Hawaii statutes.
§89C-6 Chapter takes precedence, when.
Adjustments made in accordance with this chapter shall take precedence over all
contrary local ordinances, executive orders, legislation, or rules adopted by
the State or a county, or any department, agency, board, or commission thereof,
including the personnel departments or the merit appeals boards. [L 1978, c
197, pt of §2; am L 1994, c 56, §18; am L 2000, c 253, §111]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next